Utah statutes.
76-1-501.   Presumption of innocence -- "Element of the offense" defined.

(1)  A defendant in a criminal proceeding is presumed to be innocent until each element of the offense charged against him is proved beyond a reasonable doubt.  In the absence of this proof, the defendant shall be acquitted.

(2)  As used in this part the words "element of the offense" mean:

(a)  the conduct, attendant circumstances, or results of conduct proscribed, prohibited, or forbidden in the definition of the offense;

(b)  the culpable mental state required.

(3)  The existence of jurisdiction and venue are not elements of the offense but shall be established by a preponderance of the evidence.



Amended by Chapter 278, 2013 General Session

